Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.010

Board of commissioners established—Quorum.

There is established in each county in this state a board of county commissioners. Except as provided in RCW 36.32.055 and 36.32.0552, each board of county commissioners shall consist of three qualified electors, two of whom shall constitute a quorum to do business.

[ 1990 c 252 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.32.010. Prior: Code 1881 s 2663; 1869 p 303 s 1; 1867 p 52 s 1; 1863 p 540 s 1; 1854 p 420 s 1; RRS s 4036.]